Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2402
Delivery of prisoner to Department of Correctional Services; powers and duties of sheriff.

The sheriffs of the several counties of this state, during the time they shall be employed in conveying to the Department of Correctional Services any person sentenced to the custody thereof, shall have the same power and authority to secure him in any jail within the state, and to demand the assistance of any sheriff, jailer or other person within this state, in keeping such prisoner, as if the sheriff were in his own proper county; and all such sheriffs, jailers or other persons so called upon shall be liable, on refusal, to the same penalties as if the sheriff making the demand were in his own county.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 519, p. 836;

R.S.1913, § 9189;

C.S.1922, § 10196;

C.S.1929, § 29-2402;

R.S.1943, § 29-2402;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 68, p. 3105.